Missouri, session 2026, HB2046.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the state of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 386, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto one new section, to be
known as section 386.1600, to read as follows:
386.1600. 1. In the event that more than four-fifths of one percent of customers
of an investor-owned electric utility are subjected to a continuous power interruption of
four or more hours that results in the transmission of power at less than fifty percent of
the standard voltage, or that results in the total loss of power transmission, the utility
shall be responsible for compensating customers affected by such interruption for all
actual damages, including food spoilage, which shall not include consequential damages,
suffered as a result of the power interruption. The utility shall also reimburse the
affected municipality, county, or other unit of local government in which the power
interruption has taken place for all emergency and contingency expenses incurred by
the unit of local government as a result of the interruption. A waiver of the
requirements of this subsection may be granted by the commission in instances in which
the utility can show that the power interruption was a result of any one or more of the
following causes:
(1) Unpreventable damage due to weather events or conditions;
(2) Customer tampering;
(3) Unpreventable damage due to civil or international unrest or animals; or
EXPLANATION — Matter enclosed in bold-faced brackets [thus] in the above bill is not enacted and is
intended to be omitted from the law. Matter in bold-face type in the above bill is proposed language.

HB 2046 2
(4) Damage to utility equipment or other actions by a party other than the
utility, its employees, agents, or contractors.
2. In the event of a power surge or other fluctuation that causes damage and
affects more than four-fifths of one percent of customers, the electric utility shall pay to
affected customers the replacement value of all goods, including food, damaged as a
result of the power surge or other fluctuation unless the investor-owned electric utility
can show that the power surge or other fluctuation was due to one or more of the
following causes:
(1) Unpreventable damage due to weather events or conditions;
(2) Customer tampering;
(3) Unpreventable damage due to civil or international unrest or animals; or
(4) Damage to utility equipment or other actions by a party other than the
utility, its employees, agents, or contractors.
3. Loss of revenue and expenses incurred in complying with subsections 1 and 2
of this section shall not be recovered from ratepayers.
4. Customers with respect to whom a waiver has been granted by the
commission under subdivisions (1) to (4) of subsection 1 and subdivisions (1) to (4) of
subsection 2 shall not count toward the four-fifths of one percent of the total customers
required by subsections 1 and 2 of this section.
5. Remedies provided for under this section shall be sought exclusively through
the public service commission. Damages awarded under this section for a power
interruption shall be limited to actual damages, which shall not include consequential
damages, and litigation costs. A utility's request for a waiver of this section shall be
timely if filed no later than thirty days after the date on which a claim is filed with the
commission seeking damages or expense reimbursement under this section. No utility
shall be liable under this section while a request for waiver is pending. Damage awards
shall not be paid out of utility rate funds.
6. The provisions of this section shall not in any way diminish or replace other
civil or administrative remedies available to a customer or a class of customers.
7. The public service commission may promulgate all necessary rules and
regulations for the administration of this section. Any rule or portion of a rule, as that
term is defined in section 536.010, that is created under the authority delegated in this
section shall become effective only if it complies with and is subject to all of the
provisions of chapter 536 and, if applicable, section 536.028. This section and chapter
536 are nonseverable and if any of the powers vested with the general assembly
pursuant to chapter 536 to review, to delay the effective date, or to disapprove and annul

HB 2046 3
a rule are subsequently held unconstitutional, then the grant of rulemaking authority
and any rule proposed or adopted after August 28, 2026, shall be invalid and void.
✔